Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3533
Enforcement of act.

The board shall enforce the Geologists Regulation Act and the rules and regulations, including enforcement against any unlicensed person. If any person refuses to obey any decision or order of the board, the board or, upon the request of the board, the Attorney General or the appropriate county attorney shall file an action for the enforcement of the decision or order, including injunctive relief, in the district court. After hearing, the court shall order enforcement of the decision or order, or any part thereof, if legally and properly made by the board and, if appropriate, injunctive relief.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 80.